src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
авторитет:авторитет	_N14	"авторитет" ;
айнут:айнут	_N14	"напиток" ;
аквъяныт:аквъяныт	_N14	"равенство /по величине/" ;
алфавит:алфавит	_N14	"алфавит /азбука/" ;
амппил:амппил	_N14	"водяника" ;
аниглан:аниглан	_N14	"поцелуй" ;
а̄ӈквал:а̄ӈквал	_N14	"столб" ;
аргин:аргин	_N14	"медь" ;
ас:ас	_N14	"короста" ;
а̄смас:а̄смас	_N14	"полынья" ;
ат:ат	_N14	"запах" ;
аттестат:аттестат	_N14	"аттестат" ;
бакен:бакен	_N14	"бакен" ;
бархат:бархат	_N14	"бархат" ;
билет:билет	_N14	"билет" ;
вагон:вагон	_N14	"вагон" ;
ва̄ртул:ва̄ртул	_N14	"приём /способ делать что-л/" ;
вельбот:вельбот	_N14	"вельбот" ;
вильтъят:вильтъят	_N14	"лоб" ;
вит:вит	_N14	"вода" ;
волейбол:волейбол	_N14	"волейбол" ;
восгил:восгил	_N14	"шёпот" ;
во̄тас:во̄тас	_N14	"буран" ;
во̄тас:во̄тас	_N14	"вьюга" ;
во̄шлыл:во̄шлыл	_N14	"печаль" ;
вулкан:вулкан	_N14	"вулкан" ;
глобус:глобус	_N14	"глобус" ;
гранит:гранит	_N14	"гранит" ;
делегат:делегат	_N14	"делегат" ;
депутат:депутат	_N14	"депутат" ;
ёмас:ёмас	_N14	"благо" ;
ё̄мтул:ё̄мтул	_N14	"манера//походка" ;
ёнгы̄нут:ёнгы̄нут	_N14	"игрушка" ;
ёхтыл:ёхтыл	_N14	"приезд//приход" ;
закон:закон	_N14	"закон" ;
институт:институт	_N14	"институт" ;
исмит:исмит	_N14	"похлёбка" ;
ит:ит	_N14	"скорость//быстрота//резвость" ;
кальгил:кальгил	_N14	"зуд" ;
капитан:капитан	_N14	"капитан" ;
карссыт:карссыт	_N14	"рост//высота" ;
кас:кас	_N14	"подкладка" ;
ка̄с:ка̄с	_N14	"желание//согласие" ;
каскан:каскан	_N14	"ловушка" ;
ка̄снакол:ка̄снакол	_N14	"темница" ;
ка̄т:ка̄т	_N14	"рука" ;
ка̄тпос:ка̄тпос	_N14	"подпись" ;
ке̄рас:ке̄рас	_N14	"утёс//скала" ;
керосин:керосин	_N14	"керосин" ;
кис:кис	_N14	"обруч" ;
кисгил:кисгил	_N14	"свисток /звук/" ;
клапан:клапан	_N14	"клапан" ;
кол:кол	_N14	"дом" ;
колкан:колкан	_N14	"пол" ;
компас:компас	_N14	"компас" ;
конылбвыл:конылбвыл	_N14	"локоть" ;
кран:кран	_N14	"кран /трубка/" ;
кӯкьгил:кӯкьгил	_N14	"улыбка" ;
ла̄гылнёл:ла̄гылнёл	_N14	"носки /изделие/ /ноги/" ;
ледокол:ледокол	_N14	"ледокол" ;
лё̄хъяс:лё̄хъяс	_N14	"тропа//колея" ;
лопыс:лопыс	_N14	"лист /бумаги//железа/" ;
лӯймас:лӯймас	_N14	"лом /орудие/" ;
лӯс:лӯс	_N14	"болото /травянйстое/" ;
лэ̄с:лэ̄с	_N14	"ловушка" ;
лэ̄стан:лэ̄стан	_N14	"точильный брусок" ;
лю̄лит:лю̄лит	_N14	"высота" ;
лякан:лякан	_N14	"крючок /дверной/" ;
лятгил:лятгил	_N14	"треск//хруст" ;
ля̄ххал:ля̄ххал	_N14	"весть" ;
ля̄ххал:ля̄ххал	_N14	"сообщение" ;
маимут:маимут	_N14	"поручение" ;
ма̄ньмил:ма̄ньмил	_N14	"узел /домашние вещи//груз/" ;
ма̄ньмис:ма̄ньмис	_N14	"тёлка /коровы/" ;
маснӯт:маснӯт	_N14	"одежда" ;
материал:материал	_N14	"материал" ;
ме̄т:ме̄т	_N14	"дань" ;
мил:мил	_N14	"глубина" ;
миркол:миркол	_N14	"сельсовет" ;
мискол:мискол	_N14	"коровник" ;
мохлыл:мохлыл	_N14	"узел" ;
нак-сыпта̄л:нак-сыпта̄л	_N14	"благополучно" ;
нал:нал	_N14	"ручка /рукоятка/" ;
нёл:нёл	_N14	"нос" ;
не̄пал:не̄пал	_N14	"запад" ;
нё̄тмил:нё̄тмил	_N14	"поддержка /помощь/" ;
нол:нол	_N14	"наледь" ;
нот:нот	_N14	"век /длительный период времени/" ;
нул:нул	_N14	"поток /водный/" ;
нэ̄хон:нэ̄хон	_N14	"царица /властительница/" ;
няс:няс	_N14	"крючок /рыболовный/" ;
няс:няс	_N14	"коготь /медведя/" ;
о̄вощит:о̄вощит	_N14	"овощи" ;
океан:океан	_N14	"океан" ;
о̄лтул:о̄лтул	_N14	"добро /имущество/" ;
онтас:онтас	_N14	"прок" ;
орган:орган	_N14	"орган" ;
орден:орден	_N14	"орден" ;
осот:осот	_N14	"осот" ;
па̄л:па̄л	_N14	"половина" ;
па̄л:па̄л	_N14	"нары" ;
палыт:палыт	_N14	"расстояние" ;
па̄ӈхвит:па̄ӈхвит	_N14	"ширина" ;
партизан:партизан	_N14	"партизан" ;
па̄рыс:па̄рыс	_N14	"барыш" ;
пасан:пасан	_N14	"стол" ;
па̄тас:па̄тас	_N14	"перевес /сетъ для ловли птиц/" ;
патрон:патрон	_N14	"патрон /ружейный/" ;
пе̄нтсыл:пе̄нтсыл	_N14	"замена" ;
пил:пил	_N14	"ягода" ;
пис:пис	_N14	"слой" ;
пистон:пистон	_N14	"пистон /патрона/" ;
план:план	_N14	"план /чертёж/" ;
по̄йкил:по̄йкил	_N14	"просьба" ;
поктул:поктул	_N14	"трещина" ;
полюс:полюс	_N14	"полюс" ;
пормас:пормас	_N14	"товар" ;
пормас:пормас	_N14	"поклажа" ;
пормас:пормас	_N14	"имущество" ;
портрет:портрет	_N14	"портрет" ;
порыс:порыс	_N14	"сор" ;
пос:пос	_N14	"знак" ;
по̄с:по̄с	_N14	"мишень" ;
по̄с:по̄с	_N14	"метка" ;
по̄с:по̄с	_N14	"отпечаток" ;
по̄с:по̄с	_N14	"запятая" ;
поста̄л:поста̄л	_N14	"темнота" ;
пот:пот	_N14	"ясак /натуральный налог/" ;
почтальон:почтальон	_N14	"почтальон" ;
пресмыкающеещат:пресмыкающеещат	_N14	"пресмыкающиеся" ;
промысел:промысел	_N14	"промысел /горнодобывающее предприятие/" ;
пумкан:пумкан	_N14	"покос /место/" ;
пун:пун	_N14	"шерсть /волосяной покров/" ;
пун:пун	_N14	"мех /шкура животного/" ;
пусас:пусас	_N14	"забор" ;
пӯсас:пӯсас	_N14	"кораль" ;
пӯт:пӯт	_N14	"котёл" ;
ра̄т:ра̄т	_N14	"ряд" ;
росахыт:росахыт	_N14	"лохмотья" ;
рӯт:рӯт	_N14	"родня//родственник" ;
са̄грыл:са̄грыл	_N14	"рубка" ;
саккон:саккон	_N14	"закон" ;
самвит:самвит	_N14	"слеза" ;
сампос:сампос	_N14	"зрение" ;
са̄ӈква̄хвтас:са̄ӈква̄хвтас	_N14	"почка /внутренний орган живого существа/" ;
са̄с:са̄с	_N14	"берёста" ;
са̄снёл:са̄снёл	_N14	"маска /из берёсты/" ;
слон:слон	_N14	"бивень" ;
совкол:совкол	_N14	"покрытый шкурой чум" ;
солдат:солдат	_N14	"солдат" ;
со̄пас:со̄пас	_N14	"припасы" ;
со̄с:со̄с	_N14	"ручей" ;
со̄т:со̄т	_N14	"счастье" ;
стихыт:стихыт	_N14	"стихи /строчки/" ;
сӯйпил:сӯйпил	_N14	"брусника" ;
сӯлипут:сӯлипут	_N14	"кувшин" ;
сун:сун	_N14	"нарта" ;
сус:сус	_N14	"блоха" ;
сыс:сыс	_N14	"спина" ;
сэ̄рипос:сэ̄рипос	_N14	"заря" ;
та̄л:та̄л	_N14	"год" ;
та̄л:та̄л	_N14	"игла /хвойного дерева/" ;
та̄лттыл:та̄лттыл	_N14	"посадка /в транспорт/ /о людях/" ;
таракан:таракан	_N14	"таракан" ;
та̄рвит:та̄рвит	_N14	"бремя" ;
телефон:телефон	_N14	"телефон" ;
те̄ркат:те̄ркат	_N14	"клещи" ;
толат:толат	_N14	"долото" ;
торас:торас	_N14	"препятствие" ;
то̄ргил:то̄ргил	_N14	"дрожь" ;
тул:тул	_N14	"облако" ;
туман:туман	_N14	"замок" ;
турман:турман	_N14	"темнота" ;
тӯрхул:тӯрхул	_N14	"карась" ;
тусыт:тусыт	_N14	"усы" ;
тын:тын	_N14	"ценность /цена/" ;
тыстыл:тыстыл	_N14	"печаль" ;
тыстыл-во̄щлыл:тыстыл-во̄щлыл	_N14	"горе" ;
тыт:тыт	_N14	"комель" ;
тэ̄нут:тэ̄нут	_N14	"пища//еда" ;
тэ̄пкан:тэ̄пкан	_N14	"поле /хлебное/" ;
ӯйхул:ӯйхул	_N14	"животные" ;
улас:улас	_N14	"табуретка" ;
университет:университет	_N14	"университет /высшее учебное заведение/" ;
ӯнттын:ӯнттын	_N14	"постройка /здание//дом/" ;
ӯс:ӯс	_N14	"нельма" ;
ут:ут	_N14	"штука" ;
ут:ут	_N14	"существо /живое/" ;
факел:факел	_N14	"факел" ;
флот:флот	_N14	"флот /морской//речной/" ;
ха̄йтнут:ха̄йтнут	_N14	"волк" ;
хал:хал	_N14	"расщелина" ;
хал:хал	_N14	"перерыв /промежуток времени/" ;
халмалтахтыл:халмалтахтыл	_N14	"ссора" ;
ха̄рщил:ха̄рщил	_N14	"треск//хруст" ;
хастул:хастул	_N14	"почерк" ;
хащтал:хащтал	_N14	"диковина" ;
хол:хол	_N14	"иней" ;
хо̄лмил:хо̄лмил	_N14	"спуск /место/" ;
хо̄н:хо̄н	_N14	"царь" ;
хо̄ртхан:хо̄ртхан	_N14	"коршун" ;
хо̄тал:хо̄тал	_N14	"солнце" ;
хӯл:хӯл	_N14	"рыба" ;
хулюмхул:хулюмхул	_N14	"язь" ;
хӯтмил:хӯтмил	_N14	"сгиб" ;
чемодан:чемодан	_N14	"чемодан" ;
чернота̄л:чернота̄л	_N14	"чернотал /вид ивы/" ;
шакал:шакал	_N14	"шакал" ;
шпат:шпат	_N14	"шпат" ;
ща̄гтыл:ща̄гтыл	_N14	"удовольствие" ;
щаквит:щаквит	_N14	"молоко" ;
ще̄рмат:ще̄рмат	_N14	"узда" ;
ще̄с:ще̄с	_N14	"веселье" ;
щил:щил	_N14	"бубенчик" ;
щовал:щовал	_N14	"очаг" ;
що̄с:що̄с	_N14	"часы" ;
щуртмил:щуртмил	_N14	"линия//черта" ;
э̄лмхо̄лас:э̄лмхо̄лас	_N14	"человек / человеческий" ;
э̄т:э̄т	_N14	"ночь" ;
э̄тпос:э̄тпос	_N14	"месяц /календ/" ;
яныт:яныт	_N14	"возраст" ;
я̄ӈклӯймас:я̄ӈклӯймас	_N14	"сосулька" ;
